Utah, session 2026, HB160.
Section 1. Section 20A-7-201 is amended to read:20A-7-201. Statewide initiatives -- Signature requirements -- Submission to the Legislature or to a vote of the people.(1)(a)A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to the Legislature for approval or rejection shall, after filing an initiative application, obtain:(i)legal signatures equal to 4%8% of the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(ii)from at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 4%8% of the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.(b)If, at any time not less than 10 calendar days before the beginning of the next annual general session of the Legislature, the lieutenant governor declares that an initiative petition designated under Subsection 20A-7-202(2)(c)(i) for submission to the Legislature is signed by a sufficient number of voters to meet the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the lieutenant governor shall deliver a copy of the initiative petition, the text of the proposed law, and the cover sheet described in Subsection (1)(c) to the president of the Senate, the speaker of the House, and the director of the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel.(c)The lieutenant governor shall prepare a cover sheet for a petition declared sufficient under Subsection (1)(b) that contains:(i)the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election;(ii)the number of active voters in each Utah State Senate district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election;(iii)the total number of certified signatures obtained for the initiative petition; and(iv)the total number of certified signatures obtained from each Utah State Senate district for the initiative petition.(2)(a)A person seeking to have an initiative submitted to a vote of the people for approval or rejection shall, after filing an initiative application, obtain:(i)legal signatures equal to 8% of the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(ii)from at least 26 Utah State Senate districts, legal signatures equal to 8% of the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.(b)If an initiative petition meets the requirements of this part and the lieutenant governor declares that the initiative petition is signed by a sufficient number of voters to meet the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the lieutenant governor shall submit the proposed law to a vote of the people at the next regular general election:(i)immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202; and(ii)specified on the petition under Section 20A-7-203.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the following information to any interested person:(a)the number of active voters in the state on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election; and(b)for each Utah State Senate district, the number of active voters in that district on January 1 immediately following the last regular general election.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-7-208 is amended to read:20A-7-208. Disposition of initiative petitions by the Legislature.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), when the lieutenant governor delivers an initiative petition to the Legislature, the law proposed by that initiative petition shall be either enacted or rejected without change or amendment by the Legislature.(b)The speaker of the House and the president of the Senate may direct legislative staff to make technical corrections authorized by Section 36-12-12.(c)If any law proposed by an initiative petition is enacted by the Legislature, the law is subject to referendum the same as other laws.(2)If any law proposed by an intiative petition is not enacted by the Legislature, that proposed law shall be submitted to a vote of the people at the next regular general election if:.(a)sufficient additional signatures to the petition are first obtained to bring the total number of signatures up to the number required by Subsection 20A-7-201(2); and(b)those additional signatures are verified, certified by the county clerks, and declared sufficient by the lieutenant governor as provided in Section 20A-7-105 and this part.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.